Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
486K

HOTELS

Section

486K-1 Definitions

486K-2 Hotelkeeper's lien on baggage, etc., of
guests;

summary ejectment of delinquents

486K-3 Sale of detained baggage; notice;
disposition of

proceeds

486K-4 Safe or security box for valuables;
limitation of

liability for deposited valuables

486K-5 Hotelkeeper's liability for personal
property

486K-5.5 Hotelkeeper's liability limited for
certain beach

and ocean activities

486K-5.6 Hotelkeeper's liability for provision of
certain

recreational equipment

486K-6 Hotelkeeper's liability in case of fire,
etc.

486K-7 Posting copy of law; damages recoverable
by guests

486K-8 Extension of stay provision

486K-9 Valuation of property

486K-10 Registration required

Cross References

Condominium hotels, see §467-30.

Food and beverage service charge disclosure, see §481B-14.

Hotel requirements, see §§445-90 to 96.

Tour activity providers and activity desks, see chapter 468M.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next